Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 6

Private Clubs

7-51-601. “Private club” defined.

As used in this part, “private club” means a club or organization that operates for the purpose of providing members of the club with the opportunity to engage in or view live specified sexual activities, as defined in §7-51-1401.

Acts 2015, ch. 130, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the reasons private clubs are subject to state regulation despite label as private club, see Acts 2015, ch. 130.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 130, § 3. April 9, 2015.

7-51-602. Restrictions on location — Measurements.

A private club shall not locate within one thousand feet (1,000') of a child care center, private school, public school, charter school, public park, or place of worship.

For the purposes of subsection (a), measurements shall be made in a straight line in all directions, without regard to intervening structures or objects, from the nearest point on the property line of a parcel containing a private club to the nearest point on the property line of a parcel containing a child care center, private school, public school, charter school, public park, or place of worship.

Acts 2015, ch. 130, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the reasons private clubs are subject to state regulation despite label as private club, see Acts 2015, ch. 130.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 130, § 3. April 9, 2015.

7-51-603. Sexual offenders and violent sexual offenders excluded from membership.

A private club shall not extend membership or offer access to the club to a person who must comply with the Tennessee Sexual Offender and Violent Sexual Offender Registration, Verification and Tracking Act of 2004, compiled in title 40, chapter 39, part 2, as a sexual offender or violent sexual offender.

Acts 2015, ch. 130, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the reasons private clubs are subject to state regulation despite label as private club, see Acts 2015, ch. 130.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 130, § 3. April 9, 2015.

7-51-604. Application of part — Enforcement of part.

This part shall apply only in a county having a metropolitan form of government with a population of more than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, upon the adoption of a resolution by two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body.

Upon the adoption of the resolution, the county legislative body is authorized to deny a building permit, use and occupancy permit, or other zoning permit applicable to a private club determined to be in violation of this part.

Acts 2015, ch. 130, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the reasons private clubs are subject to state regulation despite label as private club, see Acts 2015, ch. 130.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 130, § 3. April 9, 2015.

7-51-605. Part not applicable to “adult-oriented establishments”.

Nothing in this part shall apply to an adult-oriented establishment as defined in parts 11 and 14 of this chapter.

Acts 2015, ch. 130, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the reasons private clubs are subject to state regulation despite label as private club, see Acts 2015, ch. 130.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 130, § 3. April 9, 2015.